Delaware, session 153, HB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter VII, Chapter 5, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1312B. Noncompliance with sentencing order conditions of no contact. (a) If a defendant knowingly breaches any condition of a no contact provision of the defendantâs sentencing order, that breach is a new crime and each breach is a separate charge. On conviction for a breach, the defendant is punished as follows: (1) If the defendant breached a no contact provision of a sentencing order that was for at least 1 felony charge, the defendant is guilty of a class G felony. (2) If the defendant breached a no contact provision of a sentencing order that was for at least 1 misdemeanor charge, the defendant is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. (b) Nothing in this section may interfere with or prevent any court from exercising that courtâs power to punish for violations of probation .